Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 22.1. The Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act of 2002.

§ 56-575.1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Affected jurisdiction” means any county, city or town in which all or a portion of a qualifying project is located.

“Appropriating body” means the body responsible for appropriating or authorizing funding to pay for a qualifying project.

“Commission” means the State Corporation Commission.

“Comprehensive agreement” means the comprehensive agreement between the private entity and the responsible public entity required by § 56-575.9.

“Develop” or

“development”
means to plan, design, develop, finance, lease, acquire, install, construct, or expand.

“Interim agreement” means an agreement between a private entity and a responsible public entity that provides for phasing of the development or operation, or both, of a qualifying project. Such phases may include, but are not limited to, design, planning,
engineering, environmental analysis and mitigation, financial and revenue analysis, or any other phase of the project that constitutes activity on any part of the qualifying project.

“Lease payment” means any form of payment, including a land lease, by a public entity to the private entity for the use of a qualifying project.

“Material default” means any default by the private entity in the performance of its duties under subsection E of § 56-575.8 that jeopardizes adequate service to the public from a qualifying project.

“Operate” means to finance, maintain, improve, equip, modify, repair, or operate.

“Private entity” means any natural person, corporation, general partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, joint venture, business trust, public benefit corporation, non-profit entity, or other business entity.

“Public entity” means the Commonwealth and any agency or authority thereof, any county, city or town and any other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, any public body politic and corporate, or any regional entity that serves a public purpose.

“Qualifying project” means (i) any education facility, including, but not limited to a school building, any functionally related and subordinate facility and land to a school building (including any stadium or other facility primarily used for school
events), and any depreciable property provided for use in a school facility that is operated as part of the public school system or as an institution of higher education; (ii) any building or facility that meets a public purpose and
is developed or operated by or for any public entity; (iii) any improvements, together with equipment, necessary to enhance public safety and security of buildings to be principally used by a public entity; (iv) utility and telecommunications
and other communications infrastructure; (v) a recreational facility; (vi) technology infrastructure, services, and applications, including, but not limited to, telecommunications, automated data processing, word processing and management
information systems, and related information, equipment, goods and services; (vii) any services designed to increase the productivity or efficiency of the responsible public entity through the use of technology or other means, (viii)
any technology, equipment, or infrastructure designed to deploy wireless broadband services to schools, businesses, or residential areas; (ix) any improvements necessary or desirable to any unimproved locally- or state-owned real estate;
or (x) any solid waste management facility as defined in § 10.1-1400 that produces electric energy derived from solid waste.

“Responsible public entity” means a public entity that has the power to develop or operate the applicable qualifying project.

“Revenues” means all revenues, income, earnings, user fees, lease payments, or other service payments arising out of or in connection with supporting the development or operation of a qualifying project, including without limitation, money received as
grants or otherwise from the United States of America, from any public entity, or from any agency or instrumentality of the foregoing in aid of such facility.

“Service contract” means a contract entered into between a public entity and the private entity pursuant to § 56-575.5.

“Service payments” means payments to the private entity of a qualifying project pursuant to a service contract.

“State” means the Commonwealth of Virginia.

“User fees” mean the rates, fees or other charges imposed by the private entity of a qualifying project for use of all or a portion of such qualifying project pursuant to the comprehensive agreement pursuant to § 56-575.9.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2003, c. 1034; 2005, cc. 618, 865; 2007, cc. 649, 764; 2008, cc. 273, 731; 2009, cc. 754, 762.

Cross references.

As to inclusion of appropriations for major information technology projects in budget bill, see §

2.2-1509.3

.

As to energy-positive standards for public school buildings and facilities, see § 22.1-141.1 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 571, cl. 3, provides: “That it is the intent of the General Assembly that the Auditor of Public Accounts periodically review the comprehensive agreements approved under this chapter for compliance with this chapter.”

Acts 2004, c. 861, provides: “1. That on or after July 1, 2004, no new prison financing, site selection, acquisition, construction or maintenance, leasing, management or operation of any new prison facility shall be commenced unless based upon written
analysis of such components, demonstrating a benefit to the Department of Corrections, including an analysis of the costs and benefits of utilizing the Corrections Private Management Act (§

53.1-261

et seq.) or the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act (§ 56-575.1 et seq.) of the Code of Virginia, or other means as appropriate.”

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

Acts 2007, c. 764, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to proposals submitted to a responsible public entity on or after July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, c. 764, cl. 3, provides: “That the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on General Laws and Technology and the House Committee on General Laws shall convene a working group of representatives of public and private entities to revise the current
model guidelines to incorporate amendments to the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act of 2002 (§ 56-575.1 et seq.) in accordance with this act. The group shall make its recommendations available to the responsible
public entities by September 30, 2007.”

Acts 2009, c. 762, cl. 2 provides: “That the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on General Laws and Technology and the House Committee on General Laws shall convene a working group to meet at least annually to review the model guidelines used by responsible
public entities for consideration of proposals under the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act of 2002 (§ 56-575.1 et seq.) of the Code of Virginia and to consider best practices recommendations for use by responsible
public entities. The findings of the working group shall be reported to the Chairman of each respective Committee on or before September 30 of each year.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1034, in the definition of ‘operator,’ deleted “and” at the end of clause (viii), and inserted clauses (x) and (xi); in the definition of ‘qualifying project,’ deleted “or” at the end of clause (iv), inserted “or” at the end of
clause (v), and inserted clause (vi); and substituted “operate, implement, or install” for “or operate” in the definition of ‘responsible public entity.’

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 618, in the definition of “Qualifying project,” inserted clause (vii) and made a related change.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 substituted “private entity” for “operator” throughout, inserted the definitions for “Develop,” “Interim agreement” and “Operate,” deleted the paragraph defining “Operator,” rewrote the paragraphs defining “Private entity,”
“Responsible public entity” and “Revenues,” inserted “any public body politic and corporate” to the definition of “Public entity,” substituted “that meets a public purpose and is developed or operated by or for” for “for principal
use by” in the definition of “Qualifying project.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 649, in the definition of “Qualifying project,” inserted clause (vii) and the clause (viii) designation and made related changes.

The 2007 amendment by c. 764 deleted “local” preceding “jurisdiction” in the definition of “Affected jurisdiction”; added the definition of “Appropriating body”; and inserted “and services” following “infrastructure” in clause (vi) in the definition of
“Qualifying project.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 273 and 731 are identical, and in the definition of “Qualifying project” substituted “infrastructure, services, and applications, including” for “infrastructure and services, including” in clause (vi); added clause (vii); and
redesignated clauses (vii) and (viii) as clauses (viii) and (ix).

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 754, in the definition of “Qualifying project,” added clause (x) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by c. 762 substituted “the productivity or efficiency of the responsible public entity through the use of technology or other means” for “productivity or efficiency through the direct or indirect use of technology” in clause (vii) in
the definition of “Qualifying project.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

A school board may act as a responsible public entity

under the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act of 2002. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Harry J. Parrish, Member, House of Delegates, 04-011, (3/24/04).

Purchases under the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act of 2002

are not exempt from the mandatory language of §

53.1-47

, but that section is not applicable to all procurements contemplated under the Act. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Gene M. Johnson, Director, Virginia Department of Corrections, 07-104, (2/27/08).

Chief Information Officer. —

An individual may not serve simultaneously as the Secretary of Technology and the Chief Information Officer. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Samuel A. Nixon, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 09-053, (8/14/09).

§ 56-575.2.
Declaration of public purpose.

The General Assembly finds that:

There is a public need for timely acquisition, design, construction, improvement, renovation, expansion, equipping, maintenance, operation, implementation, or installation of education facilities, technology infrastructure and other public infrastructure
and government facilities within the Commonwealth that serve a public need and purpose;

Such public need may not be wholly satisfied by existing methods of procurement in which qualifying projects are acquired, designed, constructed, improved, renovated, expanded, equipped, maintained, operated, implemented, or installed;

There are inadequate resources to develop new education facilities, technology infrastructure and other public infrastructure and government facilities for the benefit of citizens of the Commonwealth, and there is demonstrated evidence that public-private
partnerships can meet these needs by improving the schedule for delivery, lowering the cost, and providing other benefits to the public;

Financial incentives exist under state and federal tax provisions that promote public entities to enter into partnerships with private entities to develop qualifying projects;

Authorizing private entities to develop or operate one or more qualifying projects may result in the availability of such projects to the public in a more timely or less costly fashion, thereby serving the public safety, benefit, and welfare.

An action under § 56-575.4 shall serve the public purpose of this chapter if such action facilitates the timely development or operation of qualifying projects.

It is the intent of this chapter, among other things, to encourage investment in the Commonwealth by private entities and facilitate the bond financing provisions of the Economic Growth and Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001 or other similar financing
mechanisms, private capital and other funding sources that support the development or operation of qualifying projects, to the end that financing for qualifying projects be expanded and accelerated to improve and add to the convenience
of the public, and such that public and private entities may have the greatest possible flexibility in contracting with each other for the provision of the public services that are the subject of this chapter.

This chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with the purposes hereof.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2003, c. 1034; 2005, c. 865.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1034, in subdivision A 1, substituted “operation, implementation, or installation” for “or operation,” and inserted “technology infrastructure”; substituted “operated, implemented, or installed” for “or operated” in subdivision
A 2; inserted “technology infrastructure” in subdivision A 3; substituted “operate, implement, or install” for “or operate” in subdivision A 5; substituted “operation, implementation, or installation” for “or operation” in subsection
B; and substituted “operation, implementation, or installation” for “or operation” in subsection C.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 substituted “develop or operate” for “acquire, design, construct, improve, renovate, expand, equip, maintain, operate, implement, or install” in subdivision A 5, substituted “development or operation” for “acquisition, design,
construction, improvement, renovation, expansion, equipping, maintenance, operation, implementation, or installation” in subsections B and C, inserted “encourage investment in the Commonwealth by private entities and” near the beginning
of subsection C, and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 56-575.3.
Prerequisite for operation of a qualifying project.

Any private entity seeking authorization under this chapter to develop or operate a qualifying project shall first obtain approval of the responsible public entity under § 56-575.4. Such private entity may initiate the approval process by requesting approval
pursuant to subsection A of § 56-575.4 or the responsible public entity may request proposals or invite bids pursuant to subsection B of § 56-575.4.

Any facility, building, infrastructure or improvement included in a proposal as a part of a qualifying project shall be identified specifically or conceptually.

Upon receipt by the responsible public entity of a proposal submitted by a private entity initiating the approval process pursuant to subsection A of § 56-575.4, the responsible public entity shall determine whether to accept such proposal for consideration
in accordance with § 56-575.16. If the responsible public entity determines not to accept for consideration the proposal submitted by the private entity pursuant to subsection A of § 56-575.4, it shall return the proposal, together
with all fees and accompanying documentation, to the private entity.

The responsible public entity may reject any proposal initiated by a private entity pursuant to subsection A of § 56-575.4 at any time. If the responsible public entity rejects a proposal initiated by a private entity that purports to develop specific
cost savings, the public entity shall specify the basis for the rejection.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2003, cc. 292, 1034; 2005, c. 865; 2011, c. 308.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 292 inserted the subsection A designation; and added subsections B through D.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1034, substituted “operate, implement, or install” for “or operate” in the first sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 substituted “develop or operate” for “acquire, design, construct, improve, renovate, expand, equip, maintain, operate, implement, or install” in subsection A.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 308 added the last sentence in subsection D.

§ 56-575.3:1.
Adoption of guidelines by responsible public entities.

A responsible public entity shall, prior to requesting or considering a proposal for a qualifying project, adopt and make publicly available guidelines that are sufficient to enable the responsible public entity to comply with this chapter. Such guidelines
shall be reasonable, encourage competition, and guide the selection of projects under the purview of the responsible public entity.

For a responsible public entity that is an agency or institution of the Commonwealth, the guidelines shall include, but not be limited to:

Opportunities for competition through public notice and availability of representatives of the responsible public entity to meet with private entities considering a proposal;

Reasonable criteria for choosing among competing proposals;

Suggested timelines for selecting proposals and negotiating an interim or comprehensive agreement;

Authorization for accelerated selection and review and documentation timelines for proposals involving a qualifying project that the responsible public entity deems a priority;

Financial review and analysis procedures that shall include, at a minimum, a cost-benefit analysis, an assessment of opportunity cost, and consideration of the results of all studies and analyses related to the proposed qualifying project. These procedures
shall also include requirements for the disclosure of such analysis to the appropriating body for review prior to execution of an interim or comprehensive agreement;

Consideration of the nonfinancial benefits of a proposed qualifying project;

A mechanism for the appropriating body to review a proposed interim or comprehensive agreement prior to execution, which shall be in compliance with applicable law and the provisions of subsection I of § 56-575.4 pertaining to the approval of qualifying
projects;

Establishment of criteria for (i) the creation of and the responsibilities of a public-private partnership oversight committee with members representing the responsible public entity and the appropriating body or (ii) compliance with the requirements
of Chapter 42 (§ 30-278 et seq.) of Title 30. Such criteria shall include the scope, costs, and duration of the qualifying project, as well as whether the project involves or impacts multiple public entities. The oversight
committee, if formed, shall be an advisory committee to review the terms of any proposed interim or comprehensive agreement;

Analysis of the adequacy of the information released when seeking competing proposals and providing for the enhancement of that information, if deemed necessary, to encourage competition pursuant to subsection G of § 56-575.4;

Establishment of criteria, key decision points, and approvals required to ensure that the responsible public entity considers the extent of competition before selecting proposals and negotiating an interim or comprehensive agreement; and

The posting and publishing of public notice of a private entity’s request for approval of a qualifying project, including (i) specific information and documentation to be released regarding the nature, timing, and scope of the qualifying project pursuant
to subsection A of § 56-575.4; (ii) a reasonable time period as determined by the responsible public entity to encourage competition and public-private partnerships in accordance with the goals of this chapter, such reasonable
period not to be less than 45 days, during which time the responsible public entity shall receive competing proposals pursuant to subsection A of § 56-575.4; and (iii) a requirement for advertising the public notice in
the Virginia Business Opportunities publication and posting a notice on the Commonwealth’s electronic procurement website shall be included.

For a responsible public entity that is not an agency or institution of the Commonwealth the guidelines may include the provisions set forth in subsection B in the discretion of such public entity. However, the guidelines of a responsible public entity
that is not an agency or institution of the Commonwealth shall include:

A requirement that it engage the services of qualified professionals, which may include an architect, professional engineer, or certified public accountant, not otherwise employed by the responsible public entity, to provide independent analysis regarding
the specifics, advantages, disadvantages, and the long- and short-term costs of any request by a private entity for approval of a qualifying project unless the governing body of the responsible public entity determines
that such analysis of a request by a private entity for approval of a qualifying project shall be performed by employees of the responsible public entity; and

A mechanism for the appropriating body to review a proposed interim or comprehensive agreement prior to execution.

History.
2005, c. 865; 2007, c. 764.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 764 rewrote the section.

§ 56-575.4.
Approval of qualifying projects by the responsible public entity.

A private entity may request approval of a qualifying project by the responsible public entity. Any such request shall be accompanied by the following material and information unless waived by the responsible public entity:

A topographic map (1:2,000 or other appropriate scale) indicating the location of the qualifying project;

A description of the qualifying project, including the conceptual design of such facility or facilities or a conceptual plan for the provision of services or technology infrastructure, and a schedule for the initiation of and completion of the qualifying
project to include the proposed major responsibilities and timeline for activities to be performed by both the public and private entity;

A statement setting forth the method by which the private entity proposes to secure necessary property interests required for the qualifying project;

Information relating to the current plans for development of facilities or technology infrastructure to be used by a public entity that are similar to the qualifying project being proposed by the private entity, if any, of each affected local jurisdiction;

A list of all permits and approvals required for the qualifying project from local, state, or federal agencies and a projected schedule for obtaining such permits and approvals;

A list of public utility facilities, if any, that will be crossed by the qualifying project and a statement of the plans of the private entity to accommodate such crossings;

A statement setting forth the private entity’s general plans for financing the qualifying project including the sources of the private entity’s funds and identification of any dedicated revenue source or proposed debt or equity investment on the behalf
of the private entity;

The names and addresses of the persons who may be contacted for further information concerning the request;

User fees, lease payments, and other service payments over the term of the interim or comprehensive agreement pursuant to § 56-575.9 or 56-575.9:1 and the methodology and circumstances for changes to such user fees, lease payments, and other service payments
over time; and

Such additional material and information as the responsible public entity may reasonably request.

The responsible public entity may request proposals or invite bids from private entities for the development or operation of qualifying projects.

The responsible public entity may grant approval of the development or operation of the education facility, technology infrastructure or other public infrastructure or government facility needed by a public entity as a qualifying project, or the design
or equipping of a qualifying project so developed or operated, if the responsible public entity determines that the project serves the public purpose of this chapter. The responsible public entity may determine that the development
or operation of the qualifying project as a qualifying project serves such public purpose if:

There is a public need for or benefit derived from the qualifying project of the type the private entity proposes as a qualifying project;

The estimated cost of the qualifying project is reasonable in relation to similar facilities; and

The private entity’s plans will result in the timely development or operation of the qualifying project.In evaluating any request, the responsible public entity may rely upon internal staff reports prepared by personnel familiar with the operation of
similar facilities or the advice of outside advisors or consultants having relevant experience.

The responsible public entity may charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs of processing, reviewing and evaluating the request, including without limitation, reasonable attorney’s fees and fees for financial, technical, and other necessary advisors
or consultants.

The approval of the responsible public entity shall be subject to the private entity’s entering into an interim or comprehensive agreement pursuant to § 56-575.9 with the responsible public entity.

In connection with its approval of the qualifying project, the responsible public entity shall establish a date for the commencement of activities related to the qualifying project. The responsible public entity may extend such date from time to time.

The responsible public entity shall take appropriate action to protect confidential and proprietary information provided by the private entity pursuant to an agreement under subdivision 11 of §

2.2-3705.6

.

Nothing in this chapter or in an interim or comprehensive agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to enlarge, diminish or affect the authority, if any, otherwise possessed by the responsible public entity to take action that would
impact the debt capacity of the Commonwealth.

Prior to entering into the negotiation of an interim or comprehensive agreement, each responsible public entity that is an agency or institution of the Commonwealth shall submit copies of detailed proposals to the Public-Private Partnership Advisory Commission
as provided by Chapter 42 (§ 30-278 et seq.) of Title 30.

Any proposed comprehensive agreement for a qualifying project where the responsible public entity is an agency or institution of the Commonwealth that (i) creates state tax-supported debt, (ii) requires a level of appropriation significantly beyond the
appropriation received by the responsible public entity in the most recent appropriation act, or (iii) significantly alters the Commonwealth’s discretion to change the level of services or the funding for such services over time,
shall be reviewed by the appropriating body prior to execution.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2003, c. 1034; 2004, c. 690; 2005, c. 865; 2007, c. 764.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1034, substituted “operation, implementation, or installation” for “or operation” and “operated, implemented, or installed” for “or operated” throughout the section; inserted “or technology infrastructure” in subdivisions A 2,
A 4, and subsection C; and inserted “technical” in subsection D.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 690 substituted “subdivision 11 of §

2.2-3705.6

” for “subdivision A 56 of §

2.2-3705

” in subsection G.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 substituted “private entity” for “operator” throughout, rewrote subdivisions A 3, A 7, subsections B and C, in subdivision A 9, inserted “interim or” preceding “comprehensive” and “or 56-575.9:1” following “§ 56-575.9,” substituted
“an interim or” for “a” in subsections E and H.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 764 added subsections I and J.

§ 56-575.5.
Service contracts.

In addition to any authority otherwise conferred by law, any public entity may contract with a private entity for the delivery of services to be provided as part of a qualifying project in exchange for such service payments and other consideration as
such public entity may deem appropriate.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2005, c. 865.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 substituted “a private entity” for “an operator.”

§ 56-575.6.
Affected local jurisdictions.

Any private entity requesting approval from, or submitting a proposal to, a responsible public entity under § 56-575.4 shall notify each affected local jurisdiction by furnishing a copy of its request or proposal to each affected local jurisdiction.

Each affected local jurisdiction that is not a responsible public entity for the respective qualifying project shall, within sixty days after receiving such notice, submit any comments it may have in writing on the proposed qualifying project to the responsible
public entity and indicate whether the facility is compatible with the local comprehensive plan, local infrastructure development plans, the capital improvements budget, or other government spending plan. Such comments shall be
given consideration by the responsible public entity prior to entering a comprehensive agreement pursuant to § 56-575.9 with a private entity.

History.
2002, c. 571.

§ 56-575.7.
Dedication of public property.

Any public entity may dedicate any property interest, including land, improvements, and tangible personal property, that it has for public use in a qualifying project if it finds that so doing will serve the public purpose of this chapter by minimizing
the cost of a qualifying project to the public entity or reducing the delivery time of a qualifying project. In connection with such dedication, a public entity may convey any property interest that it has, subject to the conditions
imposed by general law governing such conveyances, to the private entity subject to the provisions of this chapter, for such consideration as such public entity may determine. The aforementioned consideration may include, without limitation,
the agreement of the private entity to develop or operate the qualifying project. The property interests that the public entity may convey to the private entity in connection with a dedication under this section may include licenses,
franchises, easements, or any other right or interest the public entity deems appropriate.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2005, c. 865.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 substituted “governing such conveyances, to the private entity” for “to the operator” in the second sentence, “private entity to develop or” for “operator to” in the third sentence and added the last sentence.

§ 56-575.8.
Powers and duties of the private entity.

The private entity shall have all power allowed by law generally to a private entity having the same form of organization as the private entity and shall have the power to develop or operate the qualifying project and collect lease payments, impose user
fees or enter into service contracts in connection with the use thereof.

The private entity may own, lease or acquire any other right to use or operate the qualifying project.

Any financing of the qualifying project may be in such amounts and upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the private entity. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the private entity may issue debt, equity or other securities
or obligations, enter into sale and leaseback transactions and secure any financing with a pledge of, security interest in, or lien on, any or all of its property, including all of its property interests in the qualifying project.

In operating the qualifying project, the private entity may:

Make classifications according to reasonable categories for assessment of user fees; and

With the consent of the responsible public entity, make and enforce reasonable rules to the same extent that the responsible public entity may make and enforce rules with respect to similar facilities.

The private entity shall:

Develop or operate the qualifying project in a manner that is acceptable to the responsible public entity, all in accordance with the provisions of the interim or comprehensive agreement pursuant to § 56-575.9 or 56-575.9:1;

Keep the qualifying project open for use by the members of the public at all times, or as appropriate based upon the use of the facility, after its initial opening upon payment of the applicable user fees, lease payments, or service payments; provided
that the qualifying project may be temporarily closed because of emergencies or, with the consent of the responsible public entity, to protect the safety of the public or for reasonable construction or maintenance activities.
In the event that a qualifying project is technology infrastructure, access may be limited as determined by the conditions of the interim or comprehensive agreement;

Maintain, or provide by contract for the maintenance or upgrade of the qualifying project, if required by the interim or comprehensive agreement;

Cooperate with the responsible public entity in making best efforts to establish any interconnection with the qualifying project requested by the responsible public entity; and

Comply with the provisions of the interim or comprehensive agreement and any lease or service contract.

Nothing shall prohibit an private entity of a qualifying project from providing additional services for the qualifying project to public or private entities other than the responsible public entity so long as the provision of additional service does not
impair the private entity’s ability to meet its commitments to the responsible public entity pursuant to the interim or comprehensive agreement as provided for in § 56-575.9 or 56-575.9:1.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2003, c. 1034; 2005, c. 865.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1034, substituted “operate, implement, or install” for “or operate” in subsection A and in subdivision E 1; inserted the last sentence in subdivision E 2; and inserted “or upgrade” in subdivision E 3.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 substituted “private entity” for “operator” and inserted “interim or” throughout, substituted “develop or operate” for “acquire, design, construct, improve, renovate, maintain, expand, equip, operate, implement, or install”
in subsections A and E 1, substituted “activities” for “procedures” at the end of the first sentence in subdivision E 2 and inserted “lease or” preceding “service” in subdivision E 5.